Alaska, session 34, HB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 21.03.021 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (m) This title does not apply to a prepaid legal plan. In this subsection, 05 "prepaid legal plan" means an arrangement between a member and an organization in 06 which 07 (1) the member prepays for specified legal services that are available 08 to the member or the member's dependent; 09 (2) the organization contracts directly with an attorney for the 10 provision of the specified legal services and pays the attorney a fixed, prearranged 11 payment; and 12 (3) an attorney contracted under this subsection does not receive 13 additional payment or reimbursement from the organization for provision of the 14 specified legal services or the specified legal expenses. 15 * Sec. 2. AS 45.50.471(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 01 (58) violating AS 45.50.476 (prepaid legal plans). 02 * Sec. 3. AS 45.50 is amended by adding a new section to read: 03 Sec. 45.50.476. Prepaid legal plans. (a) A person that offers a prepaid legal 04 plan exempt under AS 21.03.021 may not 05 (1) engage in misleading advertising that implies the prepaid legal plan 06 is insurance or guarantees outcomes beyond the scope of covered services; 07 (2) require a member to pay for services beyond the month in which 08 the member requests to be disenrolled from the plan; or 09 (3) impose a penalty for disenrolling from the plan. 10 (b) A person that offers a prepaid legal plan shall 11 (1) before enrollment, provide a written disclosure to members that 12 includes 13 (A) a complete list of covered legal services and any significant 14 exclusions; 15 (B) the cost and payment terms of the plan; 16 (C) information on how to access services and contact 17 information for the plan administrator and participating attorneys; 18 (D) a statement that the plan is not insurance and is not subject 19 to insurance regulation; and 20 (E) the procedures for filing a complaint or resolving a dispute; 21 and 22 (2) maintain records of member complaints for at least three years and 23 make complaints available to the attorney general upon request. 24 (c) In this section, "prepaid legal plan" has the meaning given in 25 AS 21.03.021. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.